Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 161.434, is amended to read: 161.434 deleted text begin INTERSTATE ANDdeleted text end new text begin USE OFnew text end TRUNK HIGHWAY RIGHTS-OF-WAYdeleted text begin ; LIMITED USEdeleted text end . new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Limited use. new text end The commissioner may also make such arrangements and agreements as the commissioner deems necessary in the public interest for the limited use of land owned as interstate or trunk highway right-of-waydeleted text begin , whichdeleted text end new text begin . Thenew text end use deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end be for highway purposes, including aesthetic purposes, but not including the erection of permanent buildings, except buildings or structures erected for the purpose of providing information to travelers through commercial and public service advertising pursuant to agreements as provided in sections 160.272 to 160.276. The commissioner deleted text begin shalldeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end secure the approval of the appropriate federal agency where such approval is required. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Automated license plate readers. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this subdivision, "automated license plate reader" has the meaning given in section 13.824, subdivision 1. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner may establish a process to issue a permit for a local unit of government to place automated license plate readers within trunk highway rights-of-way and may specify requirements as determined necessary to protect public safety and ensure the proper function of the trunk highway. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end